Mississippi, session 2026, HB4152.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Isaac Thorne of Washington County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Burglary-Nonresidential in Bolivar County, on May 14, 1998, for which he was sentenced to serve two (2) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He was released on Shock Probation on February 8, 2000.  He was sentenced on November 7, 2002, for the crime of Burglary-Nonresidential to serve one (1) year in the custody of  the Mississippi Department of Corrections, and discharged for such crime on September 12, 2003.  He was sentenced to serve three (3) years for the crime of Robbery on November 14, 2005, was released to Earned Release Supervision and discharged for such on December 6, 2006.  He was sentenced to serve two (2) years on December 9, 2008, for the crime of Robbery. He was discharged on February 5, 2010.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.